Washington statutes.
RCW 35.06.080

Election of new officers.

The first election of officers of the new corporation after the advancement of classification is approved shall be at the next general municipal election and the officers of the old corporation, as altered by the election when the advancement was approved, shall remain in office until the officers of the new corporation are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280. A primary shall be held where necessary to nominate candidates for the elected offices of the corporation as a second-class city. Candidates for city council positions shall run for specific council positions. The council of the old corporation may adopt a resolution providing that the offices of city attorney, clerk, and treasurer are appointive.

The three persons who are elected to council positions one through six receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office and the other three persons who are elected to council positions one through six, and the person elected to council position seven, shall be elected to two-year terms of office. The person elected as mayor and the persons elected to any other elected office shall be elected to four-year terms of office. All successors to all elected positions, other than council position number seven, shall be elected to four-year terms of office and successors to council position number seven shall be elected to two-year terms of office.

There shall be no election of town offices at this election when the first officers of the new corporation are elected and the offices of the town shall expire when the officers of the new corporation assume office.

The ordinances, bylaws, and resolutions adopted by the old corporation shall, as far as consistent with the provisions of this title, continue in force until repealed by the council of the new corporation.

The council and officers of the town shall, upon demand, deliver to the proper officers of the new corporation all books of record, documents, and papers in their possession belonging to the old corporation.

[ 2015 c 53 s 20; 1994 c 81 s 9; 1965 c 106 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.06.080. Prior: 1890 p 143 s 22; RRS s 8942.]